North Dakota, session 69, HB1321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 19-24.1-01 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. "Allowable amount of usable marijuana" means the amount of usable marijuana a
registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver may purchase in a
thirty-day period under this chapter.
a. Except as provided under subdivision b:
(1) During a thirty-day period, a registered qualifying patient may not purchase
or have purchased by a registered designated caregiver more than two and
one-half ounces [70.87 grams]three ounces [85.05 grams] of dried leaves or
flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.
(2) At any time a registered qualifying patient, or a registered designated
caregiver on behalf of a registered qualifying patient, may not possess more
than three ounces [85.05 grams] four and one - half ounces [127.57 grams ] of
dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible
delivery form.
b. Notwithstanding subdivision a, if a registered qualifying patient has a registry
identification card authorizing an enhanced allowable amount:
Page No. 1 25.0676.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(1) During a thirty-day period a registered qualifying patient may not purchase
or have purchased by a registered designated caregiver more than six
ounces [170.01 grams]nine ounces [255.15 grams] of dried leaves or
flowers of the plant of genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.
(2) At any time a registered qualifying patient, or a registered designated
caregiver on behalf of a registered qualifying patient, may not possess more
than seven and one-half ounces [212.62 grams] eleven and one - fourth
ounces [318.93 grams] of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus
cannabis in a combustible delivery form.
c. A registered qualifying patient may not purchase or have purchased by a
registered designated caregiver more than the maximum concentration or
amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a thirty-day period. The maximum
concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a thirty-day period
for a cannabinoid concentrate or medical cannabinoid product, or the cumulative
total of both, is six thousandnine thousand milligrams.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 19-24.1-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
19-24.1-11. Registry identification cards.
1. The contents of a registry identification card must include:
a. The name of the cardholder;
b. A designation as to whether the cardholder is a qualifying patient, designated
caregiver, or compassion center agent;
c. A designation as to whether a qualifying patient is a minor;
d. A designation as to whether a qualifying patient or a designated caregiver's
qualifying patient is authorized to use an enhanced amount of dried leaves or
flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis to treat or alleviate the patient's
debilitating medical condition of cancer;
e. The date of issuance and expiration date;
f. A random ten-digit alphanumeric identification number containing at least four
numbers and at least four letters which is unique to the cardholder;
Page No. 2 25.0676.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
g. If the cardholder is a designated caregiver, the random identification number of
the qualifying patient the designated caregiver is authorized to assist;
h. A photograph of the cardholder; and
i. The phone number or website address at which the card can be verified.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section or rule adopted under this chapter, a
registry identification card expiration date must be one yeartwo years after the date of
issuance.
3. If a health care provider limits the written certification until a specified date, less than
one yeartwo years, the registry identification card expires on that date.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 19-24.1-16 of the
North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
a. The compassion center submits a renewal fee, in an amount not to exceed ninety
thousand eighty - one thousand dollars for a dispensary and one hundred ten
thousandone hundred thousand dollars for a manufacturing facility, which the
department shall refund if the department rejects the renewal application;
Page No. 3 25.0676.03000